Wyoming, session 2025, SF0051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 37-15-101(b), 37-15-103(a)(iv)(E), by
creating a new subparagraph (F), (viii), (ix), (xiv) and by
creating new paragraphs (xviii) and (xix),
37-15-104(a)(intro), by creating a new subsection (b) and
by amending and renumbering (b) as (c), 37-15-105(c),
37-15-202(a)(intro), (d)(intro) and (i), 37-15-203(f)(iv),
37-15-204(a), 37-15-404(c), (e)(i), (v), (vi) and by
creating a new paragraph (vii), 37-15-405, 37-15-406(b),
37-15-413(a)(intro), (i) through (iii), (b), (c)(intro),
(d) and (e)(ii), 37-15-501(c), (d), (g) and (h) and
37-15-502(a)(intro), (i) and (iii) are amended to read:
37-15-101. Short title; sunset.
(b) This chapter is repealed effective July 1, 2025
July 1, 2031.
37-15-103. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) "Essential telecommunications service"
means a customer's access to service that is necessary for
the origination or termination, or both, of two-way,
switched telecommunications for both residential and
business service within a local exchange area. Essential
telecommunications services are limited to:
(E) Switched access, which for the purposes
of this chapter shall mean the switching and transport
necessary to connect an interexchange telecommunications
company with the local exchange central office for the
purpose of originating or terminating, or both, the
interexchange telecommunications company's switched
telecommunications service;. and
(F) Local exchange service.
(viii) "Local exchange service" means the
provision of essential telecommunications residential or
business service within a local exchange area capable of
providing:;
(A) Access to interexchange services
provided by interexchange telecommunications companies;
(B) Single line flat-rate or single line
measured residential or business voice service;
(C) Transmission service and facilities
necessary for the connection between the end user's or
customer's premises and local network switching facility
including the necessary signaling service used by customers
to access essential telecommunications services;
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(D) Services necessary to connect 911
emergency services to the local network.
(ix) "Noncompetitive essential
telecommunications services" means those essential
telecommunications services at locations which have not
been found by the legislature or the commission to be
competitive in accordance with W.S. 37-15-202;
(xiv) "Universal service" means the general
availability of essential telecommunications local exchange
service at an affordable and reasonable price;
(xviii) "Broadband internet access service"
means a mass-market retail service by wire or radio that
provides the capability to transmit data to and receive
data from all or substantially all internet endpoints,
including any capabilities that are incidental to and
enable the operation of the communications service.
"Broadband internet access service" shall not include
dial-up internet access service;
(xix) "Noncompetitive local exchange service"
means local exchange service at locations which have not
been found by the legislature or the commission to be
competitive in accordance with W.S. 37-15-202.
37-15-104. Services regulated by this title.
(a) Except to the extent otherwise provided in this
section, the provisions of this title shall only apply to
noncompetitive essential telecommunications services. All
telecommunications services shall be subject to
contributions to the universal service fund required
pursuant to W.S. 37-15-501, the requirements of W.S.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
37-15-202(h), 37-15-401, 37-15-404, 37-15-412 and
37-15-413, the requirements of W.S. 37-15-105 for voice
over internet protocol and IP enabled services and the
assessment levied pursuant to W.S. 37-2-106 through
37-2-109., telecommunications service does not include, and
the provisions of this title do not apply to:
(b) The provisions of this title do not apply to
telecommunications services using radio spectrum, cellular
or other wireless technology except to the extent provided
in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection:
(i) To the extent permitted in accordance with
the requirements of federal law relating to the
consideration and determination of an application for
designation as a federal eligible telecommunications
carrier;
(ii) Determinations of eligibility for and
amounts of distribution of state universal service funds in
accordance with W.S. 37-15-502;
(iii) Any required contributions to the
universal service fund under W.S. 37-15-501;
(iv) Any required assessment levied under W.S.
37-2-106 through 37-2-109.
(b)(c) In addition to subsection (a) of this section,
telecommunications service does not include, and The
provisions of this title do not apply to:
(i) Telecommunications services provided by the
department of enterprise technology to private health care
providers under W.S. 9-2-2906(j);. or
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) Private telecommunications networks. As
used in this paragraph, "private telecommunications
network" means a system for the provision of
telecommunications service by a person for the sole and
exclusive use of the person and not for resale either
directly or indirectly.
37-15-105. VoIP and internet protocol enabled
services.
(c) If a service provider voluntarily chooses to
receive Wyoming universal service funds to support voice
over internet protocol service that otherwise qualifies for
support pursuant to W.S. 37-15-501 or 37-15-502, then that
supported voice over internet protocol service shall be
subject to all laws and rules governing the receipt of such
funds, and the support provided to those services shall not
exceed the support that would be provided to eligible
noncompetitive essential local exchange services on a
per-access-line basis.
37-15-202. Determination of competitive services.
(a) Upon petition by any telecommunications company
or pursuant to the commission's own motion, the commission
may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, find and
conclude that a telecommunications service is subject to
competition or that local exchange service is competitive
in certain locations. Any service found to be effectively
competitive pursuant to this section shall not be subject
to regulation by the commission. Any location deemed to
have effective competition for local exchange service shall
be ineligible for universal service fund support except
that a telecommunications carrier may continue to receive
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
universal service support for noncompetitive locations
pursuant to W.S. 37-15-501 and that support shall account
for price and cost adjustments necessary because of the
competitive classification of formerly supported locations.
The commission shall consider only the following factors in
determining whether a telecommunications service is subject
to effective competition:
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section
the commission shall, in an area defined by an applicant,
find retail telecommunications local exchange services
other than switched access are competitive provided:
(i) At least seventy-five percent (75%) of the
class of customers in the area have access to at least one
(1) landline carrier unaffiliated with the applicant
providing local voice exchange service. The local voice
exchange service may be provided in combination with other
services. If a company does not differentiate between
residential and business classes of service in its
application, the requirement shall be that at least sixty
percent (60%), considering residential and business
customers as one (1) class of customers, have access to at
least one (1) landline carrier unaffiliated with the
applicant;
37-15-203. Price regulation of noncompetitive
essential services.
(f) A local exchange company may seek approval to
increase the price of noncompetitive essential
telecommunications services, including switched access
charges, based on:
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Increases in the cost of providing
essential telecommunications services. The increases shall
be judged on the overall federal gross domestic product
price index published by the United States department of
commerce, bureau of economic analysis unless the applicant
demonstrates that specific cost increases are
disproportionably affecting the cost of providing their
noncompetitive essential telecommunications services.
37-15-204. Price schedules.
(a) A local exchange company shall post on its
website and file with the commission, in such form and
detail as in electronic format to the commission may
require, price schedules showing all noncompetitive
essential telecommunications services terms, conditions and
prices currently in effect and charged to customers by the
company in this state. All prices for new noncompetitive
essential telecommunications services, and any increase in
prices for noncompetitive essential telecommunications
services as authorized by the commission pursuant to W.S.
37-15-203, shall be filed with the commission for approval
thirty (30) days prior to the proposed effective date. The
company shall also provide notice to each impacted customer
electronically or in print using the same manner the
customer receives bills from the company. No price increase
for a noncompetitive essential telecommunications service
shall be effective unless the customer has been given
notice by the provider at least one (1) full billing cycle
prior to the proposed increase and the increase has been
approved by the commission as required by W.S. 37-15-203.
No price or price change is effective until filed in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this
subsection, the rules, regulations, policies, practices and
other requirements relating to services shall be posted on
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
a local exchange company's website and filed with the
commission in such form and detail as a simplified format
which is not required to comply with the tariff formatting
standards that were previously adopted by the commission.
may require A local exchange company shall not be required
to file or maintain paper copies of its price schedule with
the commission. Rules, regulations, policies, practices
and other requirements relating to noncompetitive essential
telecommunications services shall be subject to the same
requirements under this chapter as the prices of
noncompetitive essential telecommunications services.
37-15-404. Protection of telecommunications
consumers.
(c) A telecommunications company providing a
noncompetitive essential telecommunications service shall
not discontinue providing the service without the
commission's approval.
(e) The commission may adopt rules and regulations to
provide for:
(i) The interconnection of telecommunications
companies' networks at nondiscriminatory and reasonable
rates, terms and conditions, including interconnection
under 47 U.S.C. §§ 251 and 252;
(v) Telephone number portability to the full
extent technically feasible; and
(vi) The resale and sharing of services and
functions at reasonable and nondiscriminatory rates;. and
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(vii) Rates, terms and conditions of wholesale
service.
37-15-405. Complaint against prices.
Any person, and the commission on its own motion, may
complain to the commission concerning the reasonableness of
the price of any noncompetitive essential
telecommunications service or any violation of W.S.
37-15-404. Any notice and hearing of any complaint shall
be in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure
Act and this chapter. The commission shall only set aside
any price it finds after notice and hearing to be
unreasonable or unreasonably discriminatory. If the
commission sets aside a price as unreasonable or
unreasonably discriminatory, the telecommunications company
shall have sixty (60) days to file a new price which is
reasonable. The company shall refund any charges found to
be unreasonable as ordered by the commission. Rates or
prices for noncompetitive essential telecommunications
services in effect as of July 1, 2006, are deemed to be
fair and reasonable.
37-15-406. Quality of service.
(b) Any customer, and the commission on its own
motion, may complain concerning the quality of service
provided by a telecommunications company for noncompetitive
essential telecommunications service. A complaint shall be
noticed and heard as provided for in the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act. The commission, after notice
and hearing, may direct the telecommunications company to
take whatever remedial action is technically feasible and
economically reasonable to provide reasonably adequate
service. The commission shall authorize a
9

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
telecommunications provider to recover the cost of
compliance as reasonably determined by any commission order
under this section.
37-15-413. Limitation on authority of political
subdivision to enter exclusive agreement for provision of
telecommunications service or broadband internet access
service.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) through (d)
of this section, before the governing body of any city or
town or other political subdivision of this state shall
provide for the construction, maintenance or operation of
any telecommunications service or broadband internet access
service by entering into an exclusive franchise,
partnership, joint venture, contract, resale agreement or
any other exclusive agreement with any party regarding
telecommunications service or broadband internet access
service, the city, town or other political subdivision
shall:
(i) Determine, after notice and opportunity for
a public hearing, that no private provider of
telecommunications services or broadband internet access
services, as applicable, is currently providing
substantially the same or similar service anywhere within
the boundaries of the city, town or political subdivision;
(ii) Have submitted a written request to all
private providers of telecommunications services or
broadband internet access services within the boundaries of
the city, town or political subdivision for provision of
the same quality and grade of telecommunications service or
broadband internet access service within the same time
10

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
frame and at the same consumer prices proposed under the
exclusive contract;
(iii) Determine, after notice and opportunity
for a public hearing that the private telecommunications
service or broadband internet access service providers have
not agreed within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the
request submitted pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this
subsection to provide the same quality and grade of service
within the same time frame and at the same consumer prices
as proposed under the exclusive contract, or if the
provider has agreed, that the provider has not commenced
providing or constructing facilities to provide the service
in the manner agreed upon; and
(b) The governing body of a city or town or other
political subdivision shall allow the nondiscriminatory,
nonexclusive and competitively neutral use of its
rights-of-way including its poles, conduits, ducts or
similar support structures by any telecommunications
company or broadband internet access company and nothing in
this section shall be construed to the contrary.
(c) Nothing in this section shall restrict the
governing body of a city or town, or other political
subdivision, from providing a telecommunications service, a
broadband internet access service or a related facility:
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
restrict the governing body of a city or town or other
political subdivision, from providing a telecommunications
service or broadband internet access service to a party
within the geographic area in which the city, town or
political subdivision operates as a telecommunications
11

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
utility. Any city, town or political subdivision providing
a telecommunications service under this subsection shall:
(i) Provide the telecommunications service or
broadband internet access service on a nondiscriminatory,
nonexclusive and competitively neutral basis; and
(ii) Provide the telecommunications service or
broadband internet access service at a price which covers
cost, including imputed costs that the city, town or
political subdivision would incur if it were a for-profit
telecommunications company.
(e) Any person may complain to the commission, and
the commission may on its own motion initiate an
investigation, concerning any alleged violation of this
section by a city, town or political subdivision, subject
to the following:
(ii) If the city, town or political subdivision
does not cure the anticompetitive behavior within ninety
(90) days, the commission shall commence a contested case
hearing on the complaint, governed by the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act, W.S. 16-3-101 et seq. If,
following the hearing, the commission finds that the city,
town or political subdivision has violated this section,
the commission shall prohibit the city, town or political
subdivision from providing any telecommunications service
or broadband internet access service until the violation of
this section is remedied.
37-15-501. Universal service fund created;
contributions; administration.
12

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) The commission shall administer the monies in the
universal service fund to assist only those customers of
telecommunications companies located in areas of this state
with relatively high rates for noncompetitive essential
local exchange services. Services deemed competitive under
W.S. 37-15-202(a), (c) or (d) shall not be eligible for
universal service fund support under this article. The
commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, shall
determine a reasonable amount and a fair method of
distributing monies. The commission may authorize a credit
to customer bills, in the amount specified by the
commission, to reflect distributions received by the local
exchange company from the universal service fund, provided
that the credit is given only to one (1) line for each
customer or household. The commission shall ensure that
the method shall promote the emergence of competition in
providing local exchange service.
(d) In accordance with the method of distribution
determined by the commission, a telecommunications company
shall, unless it elects to receive Wyoming universal
service funds pursuant to the method set forth in
subsection (g) of this section, receive funds under this
section to the extent that its noncompetitive essential
local exchange service prices, after consideration of any
contributions from the federal universal service fund,
exceed the price benchmark established in subsection (h) of
this section.
(g) A telecommunications company that undertakes the
requirements set forth in this subsection may make a
one-time, irrevocable before July 1, 2023, election in
writing to the commission to receive Wyoming universal
service funds pursuant to this subsection rather than
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. In order to
13

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
receive funds pursuant to this subsection, the company
shall provide essential noncompetitive local exchange
service, or its functional equivalent, upon reasonable
request throughout the local exchange area of a rural
incumbent local exchange carrier, as defined by the federal
communications commission on January 1, 2015, at a price
not exceeding the price benchmark established in subsection
(h) of this section. A telecommunications company which
elects to receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant
to this subsection shall receive funds to the extent that
its loop costs, as reflected in the company's most recent
annual filing of unseparated loop costs filed with the
Universal Service Administration Company, exceed the
company's most recent annual federal universal service
funds receipts and annual local revenues. In calculating
annual local revenues the commission shall utilize the
imputed price benchmark established in subsection (h) of
this section. If an otherwise qualified company elects to
receive Wyoming universal service funds pursuant to this
subsection, but does not file an annual unseparated loop
cost report with the Universal Service Administration
Company, it shall file the equivalent information with the
commission.
(h) The price benchmark shall be thirty dollars
($30.00) thirty‑five dollars ($35.00) unless otherwise
adjusted by the commission pursuant to this subsection.
The commission shall review the price benchmark one (1)
time every four (4) years and, after review, shall adjust
the benchmark as necessary to assure that it approximates
one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the weighted statewide
average essential local exchange service price. The
commission may change the price benchmark at any time if,
after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the commission
determines that the price benchmark does not approximate
14

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the weighted statewide
average essential local exchange service price and that the
price benchmark should be adjusted by ten percent (10%) or
more.
37-15-502. Universal service fund eligibility and
distribution to carriers.
(a) Telecommunications companies which use cellular,
radio spectrum or other wireless technology to provide
supported essential services to customers who are otherwise
eligible to receive universal service support pursuant to
W.S. 37-15-501, may establish eligibility to receive
universal service fund distributions in an amount to be
determined by the commission, provided that:
(i) The telecommunications company will offer
and advertise all services supported by the universal
service fund supported services throughout the entire local
exchange area;
(iii) The telecommunications company's bill to
the customer reflects a credit for the amount of
distribution the company receives from the state universal
service fund for providing services supported by the
universal service fund supported services to that customer;
and
Section 2. W.S. 37-15-103(a)(iv)(A) through (D) and
(xvi) and 37-15-104(a)(i) through (xiii) are repealed.
15

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0051
ENROLLED ACT NO. 70, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
16